ctranslate-ol/frontend/dictionaries/dsb_DE.aff
FLAG num
SFX 200 Y 27
SFX 200 0 a .
SFX 200 0 e .
SFX 200 0 ego .
SFX 200 0 ej .
SFX 200 0 eje .
SFX 200 0 eju .
SFX 200 0 em .
SFX 200 0 emu .
SFX 200 0 i .
SFX 200 0 imej .
SFX 200 0 imy .
SFX 200 0 itej .
SFX 200 0 iśo .
SFX 200 0 u .
SFX 200 0 y .
SFX 200 0 ych .
SFX 200 0 yjo .
SFX 200 0 yjom .
SFX 200 0 yjomej .
SFX 200 0 yjomy .
SFX 200 0 yjotej .
SFX 200 0 yjośo .
SFX 200 0 yjoš .
SFX 200 0 yju .
SFX 200 0 ym .
SFX 200 0 yma .
SFX 200 0 ymi .
SFX 201 Y 21
SFX 201 0 a .
SFX 201 0 ach .
SFX 201 0 am .
SFX 201 0 ami .
SFX 201 0 e .
SFX 201 0 mej .
SFX 201 0 my .
SFX 201 0 o .
SFX 201 0 om .
SFX 201 0 oma .
SFX 201 0 omej .
SFX 201 0 omy .
SFX 201 0 otej .
SFX 201 0 ow .
SFX 201 0 owu .
SFX 201 0 ośo .
SFX 201 0 oš .
SFX 201 0 tej .
SFX 201 0 u .
SFX 201 0 y .
SFX 201 0 ćo .
SFX 202 Y 8
SFX 202 0 ijo .
SFX 202 0 ijom .
SFX 202 0 ijomej .
SFX 202 0 ijomy .
SFX 202 0 ijotej .
SFX 202 0 ijośo .
SFX 202 0 ijoš .
SFX 202 0 iju .
SFX 203 Y 9
SFX 203 0 i .
SFX 203 0 ijo .
SFX 203 0 ijom .
SFX 203 0 ijomej .
SFX 203 0 ijomy .
SFX 203 0 ijotej .
SFX 203 0 ijośo .
SFX 203 0 ijoš .
SFX 203 0 iju .
SFX 204 Y 9
SFX 204 0 ijo .
SFX 204 0 ijom .
SFX 204 0 ijomej .
SFX 204 0 ijomy .
SFX 204 0 ijotej .
SFX 204 0 ijośo .
SFX 204 0 ijoš .
SFX 204 0 iju .
SFX 204 0 u .
SFX 205 Y 15
SFX 205 0 ach .
SFX 205 0 achmej .
SFX 205 0 achmy .
SFX 205 0 achu .
SFX 205 0 ašo .
SFX 205 0 aštej .
SFX 205 0 ašćo .
SFX 205 0 e .
SFX 205 0 o .
SFX 205 0 om .
SFX 205 0 omej .
SFX 205 0 omy .
SFX 205 0 otej .
SFX 205 0 ośo .
SFX 205 0 oš .
SFX 206 Y 14
SFX 206 0 ach .
SFX 206 0 achmej .
SFX 206 0 achmy .
SFX 206 0 achu .
SFX 206 0 ašo .
SFX 206 0 aštej .
SFX 206 0 ašćo .
SFX 206 0 o .
SFX 206 0 om .
SFX 206 0 omej .
SFX 206 0 omy .
SFX 206 0 otej .
SFX 206 0 ośo .
SFX 206 0 oš .
SFX 207 Y 16
SFX 207 0 ach .
SFX 207 0 achmej .
SFX 207 0 achmy .
SFX 207 0 achu .
SFX 207 0 ašo .
SFX 207 0 aštej .
SFX 207 0 ašćo .
SFX 207 0 e .
SFX 207 0 o .
SFX 207 0 om .
SFX 207 0 omej .
SFX 207 0 omy .
SFX 207 0 otej .
SFX 207 0 ośo .
SFX 207 0 oš .
SFX 207 0 u .
SFX 208 Y 15
SFX 208 0 ach .
SFX 208 0 achmej .
SFX 208 0 achmy .
SFX 208 0 achu .
SFX 208 0 ašo .
SFX 208 0 aštej .
SFX 208 0 ašćo .
SFX 208 0 o .
SFX 208 0 om .
SFX 208 0 omej .
SFX 208 0 omy .
SFX 208 0 otej .
SFX 208 0 ośo .
SFX 208 0 oš .
SFX 208 0 u .
SFX 209 Y 6
SFX 209 0 i .
SFX 209 0 imej .
SFX 209 0 imy .
SFX 209 0 itej .
SFX 209 0 iśo .
SFX 209 0 u .
SFX 210 Y 7
SFX 210 0 i .
SFX 210 0 im .
SFX 210 0 imej .
SFX 210 0 imy .
SFX 210 0 itej .
SFX 210 0 iśo .
SFX 210 0 u .
SFX 211 Y 9
SFX 211 0 a .
SFX 211 0 e .
SFX 211 0 ego .
SFX 211 0 ej .
SFX 211 0 eje .
SFX 211 0 eju .
SFX 211 0 em .
SFX 211 0 emu .
SFX 211 0 u .
SFX 212 Y 7
SFX 212 0 i .
SFX 212 0 im .
SFX 212 0 imej .
SFX 212 0 imy .
SFX 212 0 itej .
SFX 212 0 iśo .
SFX 212 0 iš .
SFX 213 Y 8
SFX 213 0 i .
SFX 213 0 im .
SFX 213 0 imej .
SFX 213 0 imy .
SFX 213 0 itej .
SFX 213 0 iśo .
SFX 213 0 iš .
SFX 213 0 u .
SFX 214 Y 8
SFX 214 0 i .
SFX 214 0 im .
SFX 214 0 imej .
SFX 214 0 imy .
SFX 214 0 itej .
SFX 214 0 iśo .
SFX 214 0 iš .
SFX 214 0 ě .
SFX 215 Y 17
SFX 215 0 ch .
SFX 215 0 chmej .
SFX 215 0 chmy .
SFX 215 0 chu .
SFX 215 0 j .
SFX 215 0 jmej .
SFX 215 0 jmy .
SFX 215 0 jtej .
SFX 215 0 jśo .
SFX 215 0 m .
SFX 215 0 mej .
SFX 215 0 my .
SFX 215 0 tej .
SFX 215 0 śo .
SFX 215 0 š .
SFX 215 0 štej .
SFX 215 0 šćo .
SFX 216 Y 7
SFX 216 0 a .
SFX 216 0 ach .
SFX 216 0 am .
SFX 216 0 ami .
SFX 216 0 oma .
SFX 216 0 ow .
SFX 216 0 owu .
SFX 217 Y 7
SFX 217 0 ach .
SFX 217 0 am .
SFX 217 0 ami .
SFX 217 0 i .
SFX 217 0 oma .
SFX 217 0 ow .
SFX 217 0 owu .
SFX 218 Y 7
SFX 218 0 ach .
SFX 218 0 am .
SFX 218 0 ami .
SFX 218 0 oma .
SFX 218 0 ow .
SFX 218 0 owu .
SFX 218 0 u .
SFX 219 Y 7
SFX 219 0 ach .
SFX 219 0 am .
SFX 219 0 ami .
SFX 219 0 oma .
SFX 219 0 ow .
SFX 219 0 owu .
SFX 219 0 y .
SFX 220 Y 8
SFX 220 0 a .
SFX 220 0 ach .
SFX 220 0 am .
SFX 220 0 ami .
SFX 220 0 oma .
SFX 220 0 ow .
SFX 220 0 owu .
SFX 220 0 u .
SFX 221 Y 8
SFX 221 0 ach .
SFX 221 0 am .
SFX 221 0 ami .
SFX 221 0 i .
SFX 221 0 oma .
SFX 221 0 ow .
SFX 221 0 owu .
SFX 221 0 u .
SFX 222 Y 8
SFX 222 0 ach .
SFX 222 0 am .
SFX 222 0 ami .
SFX 222 0 i .
SFX 222 0 oma .
SFX 222 0 ow .
SFX 222 0 owu .
SFX 222 0 u .
SFX 223 Y 8
SFX 223 0 ach .
SFX 223 0 am .
SFX 223 0 ami .
SFX 223 0 e .
SFX 223 0 oma .
SFX 223 0 ow .
SFX 223 0 owu .
SFX 223 0 u .
SFX 224 Y 8
SFX 224 0 ach .
SFX 224 0 am .
SFX 224 0 ami .
SFX 224 0 oma .
SFX 224 0 ow .
SFX 224 0 owu .
SFX 224 0 u .
SFX 224 0 y .
SFX 225 Y 8
SFX 225 0 ach .
SFX 225 0 am .
SFX 225 0 ami .
SFX 225 0 oma .
SFX 225 0 ow .
SFX 225 0 owu .
SFX 225 0 u .
SFX 225 0 y .
SFX 226 Y 9
SFX 226 0 a .
SFX 226 0 ach .
SFX 226 0 am .
SFX 226 0 ami .
SFX 226 0 i .
SFX 226 0 oma .
SFX 226 0 ow .
SFX 226 0 owu .
SFX 226 0 u .
SFX 227 Y 9
SFX 227 0 a .
SFX 227 0 ach .
SFX 227 0 am .
SFX 227 0 ami .
SFX 227 0 i .
SFX 227 0 oma .
SFX 227 0 ow .
SFX 227 0 owu .
SFX 227 0 u .
SFX 228 Y 9
SFX 228 0 a .
SFX 228 0 ach .
SFX 228 0 am .
SFX 228 0 ami .
SFX 228 0 e .
SFX 228 0 oma .
SFX 228 0 ow .
SFX 228 0 owu .
SFX 228 0 u .
SFX 229 Y 9
SFX 229 0 ach .
SFX 229 0 am .
SFX 229 0 ami .
SFX 229 0 e .
SFX 229 0 i .
SFX 229 0 oma .
SFX 229 0 ow .
SFX 229 0 owu .
SFX 229 0 u .
SFX 230 Y 9
SFX 230 0 ach .
SFX 230 0 am .
SFX 230 0 ami .
SFX 230 0 e .
SFX 230 0 i .
SFX 230 0 oma .
SFX 230 0 ow .
SFX 230 0 owu .
SFX 230 0 u .
SFX 231 Y 9
SFX 231 0 a .
SFX 231 0 ach .
SFX 231 0 am .
SFX 231 0 ami .
SFX 231 0 oma .
SFX 231 0 ow .
SFX 231 0 owu .
SFX 231 0 u .
SFX 231 0 y .
SFX 232 Y 9
SFX 232 0 a .
SFX 232 0 ach .
SFX 232 0 am .
SFX 232 0 ami .
SFX 232 0 oma .
SFX 232 0 ow .
SFX 232 0 owu .
SFX 232 0 u .
SFX 232 0 y .
SFX 233 Y 9
SFX 233 0 ach .
SFX 233 0 am .
SFX 233 0 ami .
SFX 233 0 e .
SFX 233 0 oma .
SFX 233 0 ow .
SFX 233 0 owu .
SFX 233 0 u .
SFX 233 0 y .
SFX 234 Y 10
SFX 234 0 a .
SFX 234 0 ach .
SFX 234 0 am .
SFX 234 0 ami .
SFX 234 0 e .
SFX 234 0 i .
SFX 234 0 oma .
SFX 234 0 ow .
SFX 234 0 owu .
SFX 234 0 u .
SFX 235 Y 10
SFX 235 0 a .
SFX 235 0 ach .
SFX 235 0 am .
SFX 235 0 ami .
SFX 235 0 e .
SFX 235 0 i .
SFX 235 0 oma .
SFX 235 0 ow .
SFX 235 0 owu .
SFX 235 0 u .
SFX 236 Y 10
SFX 236 0 a .
SFX 236 0 ach .
SFX 236 0 am .
SFX 236 0 ami .
SFX 236 0 i .
SFX 236 0 oma .
SFX 236 0 ow .
SFX 236 0 owu .
SFX 236 0 u .
SFX 236 0 y .
SFX 237 Y 10
SFX 237 0 a .
SFX 237 0 ach .
SFX 237 0 am .
SFX 237 0 ami .
SFX 237 0 i .
SFX 237 0 oma .
SFX 237 0 ow .
SFX 237 0 owu .
SFX 237 0 u .
SFX 237 0 y .
SFX 238 Y 10
SFX 238 0 a .
SFX 238 0 ach .
SFX 238 0 am .
SFX 238 0 ami .
SFX 238 0 e .
SFX 238 0 oma .
SFX 238 0 ow .
SFX 238 0 owu .
SFX 238 0 u .
SFX 238 0 y .
SFX 239 Y 10
SFX 239 0 a .
SFX 239 0 ach .
SFX 239 0 am .
SFX 239 0 ami .
SFX 239 0 e .
SFX 239 0 oma .
SFX 239 0 ow .
SFX 239 0 owu .
SFX 239 0 u .
SFX 239 0 y .
SFX 240 Y 9
SFX 240 0 ach .
SFX 240 0 am .
SFX 240 0 ami .
SFX 240 0 oma .
SFX 240 0 ow .
SFX 240 0 owu .
SFX 240 0 u .
SFX 240 0 y .
SFX 240 0 ě .
SFX 241 Y 10
SFX 241 0 a .
SFX 241 0 ach .
SFX 241 0 am .
SFX 241 0 ami .
SFX 241 0 i .
SFX 241 0 oma .
SFX 241 0 ow .
SFX 241 0 owu .
SFX 241 0 u .
SFX 241 0 ě .
SFX 242 Y 10
SFX 242 0 a .
SFX 242 0 ach .
SFX 242 0 am .
SFX 242 0 ami .
SFX 242 0 oma .
SFX 242 0 ow .
SFX 242 0 owu .
SFX 242 0 u .
SFX 242 0 y .
SFX 242 0 ě .
SFX 243 Y 11
SFX 243 0 a .
SFX 243 0 ach .
SFX 243 0 am .
SFX 243 0 ami .
SFX 243 0 ej .
SFX 243 0 o .
SFX 243 0 oma .
SFX 243 0 ow .
SFX 243 0 owu .
SFX 243 0 u .
SFX 243 0 y .
SFX 244 Y 11
SFX 244 0 a .
SFX 244 0 ach .
SFX 244 0 am .
SFX 244 0 ami .
SFX 244 0 i .
SFX 244 0 im .
SFX 244 0 oma .
SFX 244 0 ow .
SFX 244 0 owu .
SFX 244 0 u .
SFX 244 0 y .
SFX 245 Y 18
SFX 245 0 ch .
SFX 245 0 chmej .
SFX 245 0 chmy .
SFX 245 0 chu .
SFX 245 0 j .
SFX 245 0 jmej .
SFX 245 0 jmy .
SFX 245 0 jtej .
SFX 245 0 jśo .
SFX 245 0 m .
SFX 245 0 mej .
SFX 245 0 my .
SFX 245 0 tej .
SFX 245 0 śo .
SFX 245 0 š .
SFX 245 0 šo .
SFX 245 0 štej .
SFX 245 0 šćo .
