ctranslate-ol/frontend/dictionaries/dsb_DE.dic
Cłonic/239
Darbnj/1,228
Dubj/1,211
Eifl/1,222
Fidźijanaŕk/1,226
Gunśer/1,236
Głow/1,244
Js/1,225
Komoric/239
Kron/1,236
Kłodnj/1,223
Kśenk/1,226
Mudr/1,236
Namibij/1,234
SOS-js/1,225
T-form/1,231
Tešnic/1,238
Tonj/1,223
Wałśer/1,236
administratork/1,226
ampul/1,234
bak/227
band/232
banturěc/224
bar/232
bottlepartyj/1,230
britw/1,236
bronidłaŕnj/1,228
bulaw/232
bydlenjotwarj/1,218
bósot/1,231
bělizn/1,236
bźezradosnosć/221
caz/239
cerkwjownic/1,238
charakterizacij/1,234
chromjet/232
delnj/1,211
disproporcij/1,234
docynjowaŕk/1,226
donatwarj/1,218
dopomoc/224
dostojnosć/221
drogoś/229
dłonj/1,218
falanks/1,238
flawt/1,231
fleksibilizacij/1,234
flink/227
fryj/235
gangwayj/1,230
gałuz/239
gaź/229
gr/1,242
graj/1,208
grajaŕnj/1,228
granj/1,223
gros/239
górucnosć/221
góźin/232
hautevoleej/1,222
hej/235
hydrostatik/1,226
hypnoterapij/1,234
infracerwjenj/1,218
jagar/1,212
jałojc/1,238
jgr/1,240
jidišćin/1,231
js/1,225
jśm/1,240
jśp/1,240
jžr/1,240
kan/1,236
kanil/1,234
kapał/243
kawč/224
kisć/229
knigł/232
knigłaŕnj/1,228
konfuznosć/221
kordul/1,234
kupj/1,223
kóž/1,238
kśipj/1,207
la-ola-žwał/1,231
laborantk/1,226
lemat/1,216
lobbyj/1,230
luln/1,209
lura/245
marchwj/1,223
maśer/1,236
megapartyj/1,230
mil/235
militarizacij/1,234
minisuknj/1,228
mjaz/239
mjen/1,212
mobilnosć/221
mokšoś/229
moritat/219
motopartyj/1,230
mrokoś/229
mutwj/1,223
móž/1,206
młoźin/1,231
nadtwarj/1,218
nagoś/229
najs/224
natwar/1,203
nawódnic/1,238
niś/229
njamóž/1,206
njebubn/1,212
njecesćownosć/221
njechwjej/1,208
njecwjern/1,212
njedogór/1,202
njegižn/1,209
njeglěda/245
njegrěj/1,208
njekacor/1,212
njekopj/1,207
njekwasn/1,212
njekśipj/1,207
njemócn/1,213
njenatśěgn/1,209
njepjelsn/1,212
njeplej/1,208
njeplumpa/245
njepóbrun/1,202
njepórědn/1,200
njepówuśěgn/1,209
njepóźaseśor/1,202
njepśeseda/245
njepśesmasa/215
njepśešmaca/215
njepśicyn/1,202
njepśiplacn/1,209
njepśižen/1,204
njerad/243
njerozwar/1,202
njerubj/1,207
njeseda/245
njesmasn/1,209
njesmjej/1,208
njeswar/1,212
njetešn/1,213
njetwardn/1,213
njetšuj/1,208
njewobslin/1,202
njewoklepj/1,207
njewopóznawa/245
njewuflinka/215
njewumjern/1,202
njewušwyrn/1,209
njewužen/1,204
njewólen/1,210
njewótgron/1,202
njewótpowjesa/245
njezašlapn/1,209
njezažen/1,204
njezekśiwja/245
njezeštyr/1,202
njezfalšowanosć/221
njezmachn/1,213
njezmachnj/1,205
njełdgaj/1,208
njełupj/1,207
njeśamn/1,213
nješepjer/1,212
nješćěpj/1,207
nježen/1,213
nježrěj/1,208
nježydn/1,213
noc/233
nowin/232
nur/1,212
onlinepomoc/224
panslawistk/1,226
panw/1,236
parodij/1,234
partyj/1,230
paśerj/1,223
pił/243
pišćał/243
platś/235
plow/232
pokaznj/1,218
porclinaŕnj/1,228
połnomóc/224
praskańc/1,238
praš/224
prosperit/1,231
pógón/1,203
pórědn/1,200
płaśizn/1,236
pśeddanj/1,218
pśekusn/1,209
pśeludnjonosć/221
pśemóc/224
pśepěn/1,202
pśesmasa/215
pśetunj/1,211
pśetwar/1,203
pśešmaca/215
pśešywank/1,226
pśijaznj/1,218
pśipowěda/245
pśipowěź/229
pśitwar/1,203
pśižen/1,204
pšašańc/1,238
rad/243
ratś/235
raźcownj/1,228
reichswehr/232
rjadkwj/1,223
rogož/239
rozměj/1,208
rozšyr/1,203
rubj/1,207
ruk/227
ryb/1,231
rž/1,225
samsepomoc/224
signifikantnosć/221
sinologij/1,234
slědkkupj/1,218
snj/1,220
spiwaŕnic/1,238
spowěź/229
stewardes/239
stojaškowaŕk/1,226
stron/237
stronj/1,223
stur/232
suchotwarj/1,218
sudaŕnj/1,228
supermóc/224
syś/229
sćěn/1,236
tabucon/1,231
tek/227
traj/1,208
trikotaž/239
twardn/1,213
tśaslic/1,238
war/1,212
wijkn/1,209
wjelikomyslnosć/221
wobcer/1,203
wobsen/1,203
wobstaraŕnj/1,228
wobtwar/1,203
wobzelen/1,202
woklepj/1,207
wrośb/1,231
wucycowaŕk/1,226
wuflinka/215
wuklej/235
wuplěwa/245
wupokaznj/1,218
wupomoc/224
wutraj/1,208
wutwarj/1,223
wužen/1,204
wód/232
wólen/1,210
wós/239
wósen/1,203
wótgón/1,203
wótplun/1,209
wótpowěź/229
wóttwar/1,203
wěž/201
włosenj/1,218
x-nog/1,217
zadan/1,203
zagór/1,202
zamkaŕnj/1,228
zaměšanosć/221
zažen/1,204
zmachn/1,213
zmachnj/1,205
łupj/1,207
śmicka/245
śp/1,242
šapcyck/1,226
šenkaž/239
šepn/1,209
škl/1,241
škr/1,214
škrjokowin/1,231
škórodwj/1,223
šwikał/243
šyjaŕnic/1,238
šćěpj/1,207
žebor/1,212
žen/1,213
žmjej/1,208
žr/1,242
žrějaŕnj/1,228
žydn/1,213
žył/243
